Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB771.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 11 TLSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 FY 2026-2027 APPROPRIATIONS 2 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES. 3 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 4 to the department of administrative services for the fiscal 5 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 6 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 10 equivalent positions: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,602,306 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 50.00 13 b. For the payment of utility costs, and for not more than 14 the following full-time equivalent positions: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,487,598 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.00 17 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated 18 for utility costs in this lettered paragraph that remain 19 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 20 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 21 for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding 22 fiscal year. 23 c. For Terrace Hill operations, and for not more than the 24 following full-time equivalent positions: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 460,884 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.37 27 d. For state library services: 28 (1) For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 29 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 30 equivalent positions: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,626,613 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 19.00 33 (2) For the enrich Iowa program established under section 34 8A.209 : 35 -1- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 1/ 21 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,464,823 1 e. (1) For support of the stateâs historical resources, and 2 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,804,774 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 37.00 5 (2) The department shall coordinate historical and cultural 6 activities with the tourism office of the economic development 7 authority to promote attendance at the state historical 8 building and at the stateâs historic sites. 9 f. For administration and support of the stateâs historic 10 sites, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 11 positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,751 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 3.00 14 2. Any moneys and premiums collected by the department 15 for workersâ compensation shall be segregated into a separate 16 workersâ compensation fund in the state treasury to be used 17 for payment of state employeesâ workersâ compensation claims 18 and administrative costs. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , 19 unencumbered or unobligated moneys remaining in this workersâ 20 compensation fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not 21 revert but shall remain available for expenditure for purposes 22 of the fund in subsequent fiscal years. 23 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ââ 24 REVOLVING FUNDS. There is appropriated to the department of 25 administrative services for the fiscal year beginning July 26 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, from the revolving funds 27 designated in chapter 8A and from internal service funds 28 created by the department such amounts as the department deems 29 necessary for the operation of the department consistent with 30 the requirements of chapter 8A . 31 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ââ STATE 32 EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION CHARGE. For the 33 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 34 the monthly per contract administrative charge which may be 35 -2- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 2/ 21 H.F. _____ assessed by the department of administrative services shall be 1 $2.00 per contract on all health insurance plans administered 2 by the department. 3 Sec. 4. AUDITOR OF STATE. 4 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 5 to the office of the auditor of state for the fiscal year 6 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 7 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 8 purposes designated: 9 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 10 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 11 equivalent positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,002,686 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 98.00 14 2. The auditor of state may retain additional full-time 15 equivalent positions as is reasonable and necessary to 16 perform governmental subdivision audits which are reimbursable 17 pursuant to section 11.20 or 11.21 , to perform audits which are 18 requested by and reimbursable from the federal government, and 19 to perform work requested by and reimbursable from departments 20 or agencies pursuant to section 11.5A or 11.5B . The auditor 21 of state shall notify the department of management, the 22 legislative fiscal committee, and the legislative services 23 agency of the additional full-time equivalent positions 24 retained. 25 3. The auditor of state shall allocate moneys from the 26 appropriation in this section solely for audit work related to 27 the annual comprehensive financial report, federally required 28 audits, and investigations of embezzlement, theft, or other 29 significant financial irregularities until the audit of the 30 annual comprehensive financial report is complete. 31 Sec. 5. IOWA ETHICS AND CAMPAIGN DISCLOSURE BOARD. There 32 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 33 Iowa ethics and campaign disclosure board for the fiscal year 34 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 35 -3- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 3/ 21 H.F. _____ amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 1 purposes designated: 2 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 3 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 4 equivalent positions: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,045,432 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 7.00 7 Sec. 6. GOVERNOR AND LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR. There is 8 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the offices 9 of the governor and the lieutenant governor for the fiscal year 10 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 11 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 12 purposes designated: 13 1. GENERAL OFFICE 14 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 15 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 16 equivalent positions: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,864,932 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 25.00 19 2. TERRACE HILL QUARTERS 20 For the governorâs quarters at Terrace Hill, including 21 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and 22 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 144,222 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.00 25 Sec. 7. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND 26 LICENSING. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 27 state to the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 28 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 29 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 30 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 31 1. ADMINISTRATION DIVISION 32 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 33 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 34 equivalent positions: 35 -4- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 4/ 21 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 808,285 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 11.55 2 2. ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS DIVISION 3 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 4 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 5 equivalent positions: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 654,983 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 23.00 8 3. INVESTIGATIONS 9 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 10 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 11 equivalent positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,769,231 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 56.00 14 b. By December 1, 2026, the department shall submit a 15 report to the general assembly concerning the departmentâs 16 activities relative to fraud in public assistance programs for 17 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 18 2026. The report must include but is not limited to a summary 19 of the number of cases investigated, case outcomes, overpayment 20 dollars identified, amount of cost avoidance, and actual 21 dollars recovered. 22 4. HEALTH FACILITIES 23 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 24 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 25 equivalent positions: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,206,128 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 132.00 28 b. The department shall make all of the following 29 information available to the public as part of the departmentâs 30 development efforts to revise the departmentâs internet site: 31 (1) The number of inspections of health facilities 32 conducted by the department annually by type of service 33 provider and type of inspection. 34 (2) The total annual operations budget for the department 35 -5- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 5/ 21 H.F. _____ that is associated with health facilities regulation, including 1 general fund appropriations and federal contract dollars 2 received by type of service provider inspected. 3 (3) The total number of full-time equivalent positions 4 in the department that are associated with health facilities 5 regulation, to include the number of full-time equivalent 6 positions serving in a supervisory capacity, and serving as 7 surveyors, inspectors, or monitors in the field by type of 8 service provider inspected. 9 (4) Identification of state and federal survey trends, 10 cited regulations, the scope and severity of deficiencies 11 identified, and federal and state fines assessed and collected 12 concerning nursing and assisted living facilities and programs. 13 c. It is the intent of the general assembly that the 14 department continuously solicit input from health facilities 15 regulated by the department to assess and improve the 16 departmentâs level of collaboration and to identify new 17 opportunities for cooperation. 18 5. EMPLOYMENT APPEAL BOARD 19 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 20 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 21 equivalent positions: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 510,782 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 11.00 24 b. The employment appeal board shall be reimbursed by the 25 department for all costs associated with hearings conducted 26 under chapter 91C related to contractor registration. The 27 board may expend, in addition to the amount appropriated under 28 this subsection, additional amounts as are directly billable 29 to the department under this subsection and to retain the 30 additional full-time equivalent positions as needed to conduct 31 hearings required pursuant to chapter 91C . 32 c. The employment appeal board may temporarily exceed and 33 draw more than the amount appropriated in this subsection and 34 incur a negative cash balance as long as there are receivables 35 -6- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 6/ 21 H.F. _____ of federal funds equal to or greater than the negative balance 1 and the amount appropriated in this subsection is not exceeded 2 at the close of the fiscal year. 3 6. IOWA OFFICE OF CIVIL RIGHTS 4 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 5 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 6 equivalent positions: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,538,921 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 30.00 9 b. The Iowa office of civil rights may enter into a contract 10 with a nonprofit organization to provide legal assistance to 11 resolve civil rights complaints. 12 7. LABOR SERVICES 13 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 14 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 15 equivalent positions: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,965,719 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 50.00 18 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 19 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 20 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 21 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 22 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 23 8. DIVISION OF WORKERSâ COMPENSATION 24 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 25 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 26 equivalent positions: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,381,044 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 26.00 29 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 30 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 31 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 32 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 33 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 34 9. PROFESSIONAL LICENSING 35 -7- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 7/ 21 H.F. _____ For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 1 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 2 equivalent positions: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,627,969 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 139.00 5 10. APPROPRIATION REALLOCATION 6 Notwithstanding section 8.39 , the department of inspections, 7 appeals, and licensing, in consultation with the department of 8 management, may reallocate moneys appropriated in this section 9 as necessary to best fulfill the needs of the department 10 of inspections, appeals, and licensing provided for in the 11 appropriation. However, the department of inspections, 12 appeals, and licensing shall not reallocate moneys appropriated 13 for labor services or the division of workersâ compensation. 14 Sec. 8. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 15 ââ LICENSE OR REGISTRATION FEES. 16 1. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 17 June 30, 2027, the department of inspections, appeals, and 18 licensing shall collect any license or registration fees or 19 electronic transaction fees generated during the fiscal year 20 as a result of licensing and registration activities under 21 chapters 99B , 137C , 137D , and 137F . 22 2. From the fees collected by the department under this 23 section on behalf of a municipal corporation with which 24 the department has an agreement pursuant to section 137F.3 , 25 through a statewide electronic licensing system operated by 26 the department, notwithstanding section 137F.6, subsection 2 , 27 the department shall remit the amount of those fees to the 28 municipal corporation for whom the fees were collected less 29 any electronic transaction fees collected by the department to 30 enable electronic payment. 31 3. From the fees collected by the department under this 32 section, other than those fees described in subsection 2, 33 the department shall deposit the amount of $290,435 into the 34 general fund of the state prior to June 30, 2027. 35 -8- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 8/ 21 H.F. _____ 4. From the fees collected by the department under this 1 section, other than those fees described in subsections 2 and 2 3, the department shall retain the remainder of the fees for 3 the purposes of enforcing the provisions of chapters 99B , 137C , 4 137D , and 137F . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys retained 5 by the department pursuant to this subsection that remain 6 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 7 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 8 for the purposes of enforcing the provisions of chapters 99B , 9 137C , 137D , and 137F during the succeeding fiscal year. The 10 department shall provide an annual report to the department 11 of management and the legislative services agency on fees 12 billed and collected and expenditures from the moneys retained 13 by the department in a format determined by the department 14 of management in consultation with the legislative services 15 agency. 16 Sec. 9. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 17 ââ RACING AND GAMING COMMISSION ââ RACING AND GAMING 18 REGULATION. There is appropriated from the gaming regulatory 19 revolving fund created in section 99F.20 to the racing and 20 gaming commission of the department of inspections, appeals, 21 and licensing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 22 ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof 23 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 24 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 25 purposes for regulation, administration, and enforcement of 26 pari-mutuel racetracks, excursion boat gambling, gambling 27 structure laws, sports wagering, and fantasy sports contests, 28 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 29 positions: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,049,999 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 57.70 32 Sec. 10. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 33 ââ ROAD USE TAX FUND. There is appropriated from the road 34 use tax fund created in section 312.1 to the administrative 35 -9- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 9/ 21 H.F. _____ hearings division of the department of inspections, appeals, 1 and licensing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 2 ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof 3 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 4 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 5 purposes: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,623,897 7 Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES 8 ââ COMMERCE REVOLVING FUND. There is appropriated from the 9 commerce revolving fund created in section 546.12 to the 10 department of insurance and financial services for the fiscal 11 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 12 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 13 used for the purposes designated: 14 1. BANKING DIVISION 15 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 16 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 17 equivalent positions: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 14,881,690 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 79.00 20 2. CREDIT UNION DIVISION 21 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 22 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 23 equivalent positions: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,018,710 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 16.00 26 3. INSURANCE DIVISION 27 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 28 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 29 equivalent positions: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,010,719 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 131.85 32 b. The insurance division expenditures for examination 33 purposes may exceed the projected receipts, refunds, and 34 reimbursements, estimated pursuant to section 505.7, subsection 35 -10- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 10/ 21 H.F. _____ 7 , including the expenditures for retention of additional 1 personnel, if the expenditures are fully reimbursable and the 2 division first does all of the following: 3 (1) Notifies the department of management, the legislative 4 services agency, and the legislative fiscal committee of the 5 need for the expenditures. 6 (2) Files with each of the entities named in subparagraph 7 (1) the legislative and regulatory justification for the 8 expenditures, along with an estimate of the expenditures. 9 Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES ââ 10 GENERAL FUND. There is appropriated from the general fund of 11 the state to the department of insurance and financial services 12 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 13 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 14 to be used for the purposes designated: 15 For deposit in the captive insurance regulatory and 16 supervision fund created in section 521J.12 for use as provided 17 in section 521J.12 , including salaries, support, maintenance, 18 and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following 19 full-time equivalent positions: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 450,000 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.00 22 Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT. There is appropriated 23 from the general fund of the state to the department of 24 management for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 25 ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof 26 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 27 1. For enterprise resource planning, providing for a 28 salary model administrator, conducting performance audits, the 29 departmentâs LEAN process, and criminal and juvenile justice 30 planning; for salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 31 purposes; and for not more than the following full-time 32 equivalent positions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,666,154 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 29.00 35 -11- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 11/ 21 H.F. _____ 2. a. For the division of information technology; for 1 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes; and 2 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,421,887 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 24.39 5 b. Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection, $325,000 6 is allocated to providing cybersecurity services to local 7 governments. 8 Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT ââ INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY 9 ââ REVOLVING AND INTERNAL FUNDS. 10 1. There is appropriated to the department of management 11 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 12 30, 2027, from the revolving funds designated in chapter 8, 13 subchapter XI , and from internal service funds created under 14 section 8.92 , such amounts as the department deems necessary 15 for the operation of the department pursuant to and consistent 16 with the requirements of chapter 8, subchapter XI . 17 2. a. Notwithstanding section 321A.3, subsection 1 , for the 18 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 19 the first $750,000 collected and transferred to the treasurer 20 of state with respect to the fees for transactions involving 21 the furnishing of a certified abstract of a vehicle operating 22 record under section 321A.3, subsection 1 , shall be transferred 23 to the IowAccess revolving fund created in section 8.90 for 24 the purposes of developing, implementing, maintaining, and 25 expanding electronic access to government records as provided 26 by law. 27 b. All fees collected with respect to transactions 28 involving IowAccess shall be deposited in the IowAccess 29 revolving fund created under section 8.90 and shall be used 30 only for the support of IowAccess projects. 31 Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT ââ ROAD USE TAX 32 FUND. There is appropriated from the road use tax fund created 33 in section 312.1 to the department of management for the fiscal 34 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 35 -12- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 12/ 21 H.F. _____ following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 1 used for the purposes designated: 2 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 3 purposes: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 56,000 5 Sec. 16. IPERS ââ GENERAL OFFICE. There is appropriated 6 from the Iowa public employeesâ retirement fund created in 7 section 97B.7 to the Iowa public employeesâ retirement system 8 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 9 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 10 to be used for the purposes designated: 11 For salaries, support, maintenance, and other operational 12 purposes to pay the costs of the Iowa public employeesâ 13 retirement system, and for not more than the following 14 full-time equivalent positions: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 26,330,702 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 110.00 17 Sec. 17. IOWA PUBLIC INFORMATION BOARD. There is 18 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the Iowa 19 public information board for the fiscal year beginning July 20 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or 21 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 22 designated: 23 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 24 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 25 equivalent positions: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 496,227 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.00 28 Sec. 18. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. 29 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 30 to the department of revenue for the fiscal year beginning July 31 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or 32 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 33 designated: 34 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 35 -13- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 13/ 21 H.F. _____ purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 1 equivalent positions: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,349,678 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 166.66 4 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, the 5 department shall use $400,000 to pay the direct costs of 6 compliance related to the collection and distribution of local 7 sales and services taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 423B . 8 2. The director of revenue shall prepare and issue a state 9 appraisal manual and the revisions to the state appraisal 10 manual as provided in section 421.17, subsection 17 , without 11 cost to a city or county. 12 Sec. 19. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE ââ MOTOR VEHICLE FUEL TAX 13 FUND. There is appropriated from the motor vehicle fuel tax 14 fund created pursuant to section 452A.77 to the department of 15 revenue for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 16 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 17 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 18 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 19 purposes, and for administration and enforcement of the 20 provisions of chapter 452A and the motor vehicle fuel tax 21 program: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,305,775 23 Sec. 20. SECRETARY OF STATE. There is appropriated from 24 the general fund of the state to the office of the secretary of 25 state for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 26 June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 27 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 28 1. ADMINISTRATION AND ELECTIONS 29 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 30 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 31 equivalent positions: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,566,697 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 19.25 34 b. The state department or agency that provides data 35 -14- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 14/ 21 H.F. _____ processing services to support voter registration file 1 maintenance and storage shall provide those services without 2 charge. 3 2. BUSINESS SERVICES 4 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 5 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 6 equivalent positions: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,568,795 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 16.75 9 Sec. 21. SECRETARY OF STATE ââ ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY 10 PROGRAM REVOLVING FUND. There is appropriated from the address 11 confidentiality program revolving fund created in section 9.8 12 to the office of the secretary of state for the fiscal year 13 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 14 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 15 purposes designated: 16 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 17 purposes: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 195,400 19 Sec. 22. SECRETARY OF STATE FILING FEES REFUND. 20 Notwithstanding the obligation to collect fees pursuant to the 21 provisions of section 489.122, subsection 1 , paragraphs âcâ and 22 âsâ, section 490.122, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ, and section 23 504.113, subsection 1 , paragraphs âaâ, âcâ, âdâ, âjâ, âkâ, 24 âlâ, and âmâ, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, the 25 secretary of state may refund these fees to the filer pursuant 26 to rules established by the secretary of state. The decision 27 of the secretary of state not to issue a refund under rules 28 established by the secretary of state is final and not subject 29 to review pursuant to chapter 17A . 30 Sec. 23. TREASURER OF STATE. 31 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 32 state to the office of treasurer of state for the fiscal year 33 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 34 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 35 -15- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 15/ 21 H.F. _____ purposes designated: 1 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 2 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 3 equivalent positions: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,046,415 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 28.00 6 b. For deposit in the administrative fund of the Iowa ABLE 7 savings plan trust created in section 12I.4, for implementation 8 and administration activities of the Iowa ABLE savings plan 9 trust: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 11 2. The office of treasurer of state shall supply 12 administrative support for the executive council. 13 Sec. 24. TREASURER OF STATE ââ ROAD USE TAX FUND. There 14 is appropriated from the road use tax fund created in section 15 312.1 to the office of treasurer of state for the fiscal year 16 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 17 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 18 purposes designated: 19 For enterprise resource management costs related to the 20 distribution of road use tax fund moneys: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 316,788 22 Sec. 25. IOWA UTILITIES COMMISSION. 23 1. There is appropriated from the commerce revolving fund 24 created in section 546.12 to the Iowa utilities commission for 25 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 26 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 27 to be used for the purposes designated: 28 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 29 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 30 equivalent positions: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,080,831 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 80.00 33 2. The Iowa utilities commission may expend additional 34 moneys, including moneys for additional personnel, if those 35 -16- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 16/ 21 H.F. _____ additional expenditures are actual expenses which exceed the 1 moneys budgeted for utility regulation and the expenditures are 2 fully reimbursable. Before the commission expends or encumbers 3 an amount in excess of the moneys budgeted for regulation, the 4 commission shall first do all of the following: 5 a. Notify the department of management, the legislative 6 services agency, and the legislative fiscal committee of the 7 need for the expenditures. 8 b. File with each of the entities named in paragraph âaâ the 9 legislative and regulatory justification for the expenditures, 10 along with an estimate of the expenditures. 11 Sec. 26. CHARGES ââ IOWA UTILITIES COMMISSION AND 12 DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES. The Iowa 13 utilities commission and each division of the department of 14 insurance and financial services shall include in its charges 15 assessed or revenues generated an amount sufficient to cover 16 the amount stated in its appropriation and any state-assessed 17 indirect costs determined by the department of administrative 18 services. 19 Sec. 27. IOWA PRODUCTS. As a condition of receiving an 20 appropriation, any agency appropriated moneys pursuant to 21 this division of this Act shall give first preference when 22 purchasing a product to an Iowa product or a product produced 23 by an Iowa-based business, and shall give second preference to 24 a United States product or a product produced by a business 25 based in the United States. 26 Sec. 28. LIMITATION OF STANDING APPROPRIATION. 27 Notwithstanding the standing appropriation in the following 28 designated section for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, 29 and ending June 30, 2027, the amount appropriated from the 30 general fund of the state pursuant to that section for the 31 following designated purpose shall not exceed the following 32 amount: 33 For the enforcement of chapter 453D relating to tobacco 34 product manufacturers under section 453D.8 : 35 -17- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 17/ 21 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,525 1 DIVISION II 2 DEPOSIT OF CERTAIN FEES 3 Sec. 29. Section 10A.519, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 4 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. The fees collected by the director 6 under this subsection shall be deposited in the licensing and 7 regulation fund created in section 10A.507. 8 Sec. 30. Section 10A.519, subsection 7, Code 2026, is 9 amended to read as follows: 10 7. a. A consumer fireworks fee fund is created in the state 11 treasury under the control of the director. Notwithstanding 12 section 12C.7 , interest or earnings on moneys in the consumer 13 fireworks fee fund shall be credited to the consumer fireworks 14 fee fund. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the director 15 to be used to fulfill the responsibilities of the director for 16 the administration and enforcement of this section and section 17 10A.520 and to provide grants pursuant to paragraph âbâ . The 18 fund shall include the fees collected by the director under the 19 fee schedule established pursuant to subsection 3 and the fees 20 collected by the director under section 10A.520 for wholesaler 21 registration. 22 b. The director shall establish a local fire protection and 23 emergency medical service providers grant program to provide 24 grants in the following order of priority: 25 (1) a. Local fire protection service providers and 26 local emergency medical service providers to establish or 27 provide fireworks safety education programming to members of 28 the public, and for the purchase of necessary enforcement, 29 protection, or emergency response equipment related to the sale 30 and use of consumer fireworks in this state. 31 (2) b. Local volunteer fire protection service providers 32 for the purchase of necessary enforcement, protection, or 33 emergency response equipment. 34 Sec. 31. Section 10A.520, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 35 -18- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 18/ 21 H.F. _____ amended to read as follows: 1 3. The director shall establish an annual registration fee 2 of one thousand dollars for wholesalers of consumer fireworks 3 within the state. Registration fees collected pursuant to 4 this section shall be deposited in the consumer fireworks fee 5 fund created in section 10A.519 licensing and regulation fund 6 created in section 10A.507 . 7 Sec. 32. Section 90A.10, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 8 to read as follows: 9 1. Moneys collected pursuant to section 90A.9 from a 10 professional boxing event are appropriated to the department 11 of inspections, appeals, and licensing and shall be used by 12 the commissioner to award grants to organizations that promote 13 amateur boxing matches in this state deposited in the licensing 14 and regulation fund created in section 10A.507 . All other 15 moneys collected by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter 16 are appropriated to the department of inspections, appeals, and 17 licensing and shall be used by the commissioner to administer 18 this chapter . Section 8.33 applies only to moneys in excess 19 of the first twenty thousand dollars appropriated each fiscal 20 year. 21 Sec. 33. Section 99B.58, Code 2026, is amended to read as 22 follows: 23 99B.58 Electrical or mechanical amusement devices ââ special 24 fund deposit of fees . 25 Fees collected by the department pursuant to sections 26 99B.53 and 99B.56 shall be deposited in a special fund created 27 in the state treasury. Moneys in the fund are appropriated 28 to the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 29 and the department of public safety for administration and 30 enforcement of this subchapter , including employment of 31 necessary personnel. The distribution of moneys in the fund 32 to the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing and 33 the department of public safety shall be pursuant to a written 34 policy agreed upon by the departments. Notwithstanding section 35 -19- LSB 5000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 19/ 21 H.F. _____ 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys deposited 1 in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Notwithstanding 2 section 8.33 , moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a 3 fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state 4 the licensing and regulation fund created in section 10A.507 . 5 Sec. 34. Section 505.7, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 3. Forty percent of the nonexamination Nonexamination 8 revenues payable to the division of insurance or the department 9 of revenue in connection with the regulation of insurance 10 companies or other entities subject to the regulatory 11 jurisdiction of the division shall be deposited in the commerce 12 revolving fund created in section 546.12 and shall be subject 13 to annual appropriation to the division for its operations 14 and is also subject to expenditure under subsection 6 . The 15 remaining nonexamination revenues payable to the division of 16 insurance or the department of revenue shall be deposited in 17 the general fund of the state. 18 Sec. 35. TRANSFER OF MONEYS. On the effective date of 19 this division of this Act, unencumbered and unobligated moneys 20 remaining in the consumer fireworks fee fund created in section 21 10A.519, Code 2026, and the special fund created in section 22 99B.58, Code 2026, shall be transferred to the licensing and 23 regulation fund created in section 10A.507. 24